Hawaii statutes.
[§9-6] Qualifying standards for
individual artist fellowships. Any individual applying for a fellowship
shall meet all of the following standards:

(1) The individual has proof of United States
citizenship or permanent United States resident alien status and is a resident
of the State of Hawaii at the time of application;

(2) The individual is a recognized professional
artist who:

(A) Engages in a particular art form or
discipline as a result of education, experience, or natural talent; and

(B) Is financially compensated for engaging
in the art form or discipline as part of the individual's livelihood; and

(3) The individual is able to provide documentation
of having engaged in artistic endeavors for at least five years prior to the
time of application. [L 1993, c 133, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next